tr: Hamur şekillendirme aparatıyla birlikte verilen aksesuarlar: Kesiciler; Kullanım kitapçığı/fikir kılavuzu; Bıçak; Kalıplar; Merdane; Şekillendirme aletleri; Şekil presi plakaları/diskleri; Damgalar; Saklama kabı; Diğer
el: Περιλαμβάνονται αξεσουάρ στη συσκευή εξώθησης ζύμης: Κόφτες; Βιβλιαράκι οδηγιών/οδηγός ιδεών; Μαχαίρι; Καλούπια; Πλάστης; Εργαλεία γλυπτικής; Πλάκες/δίσκοι πρέσας σχημάτων; Σφραγίδες; Δοχείο αποθήκευσης; Άλλο
sl-SI: Priloženi dodatki za ekstruder testa: Rezalniki; Knjižica z navodili/idejami; Nož; Modeli; Valjar; Orodja za kiparjenje/oblikovanje; Plošče/diski za prešanje oblik; Štampiljke; Posoda za shranjevanje; Drugo
da: Tilbehør til dejekstruder medfølger: Udstikkere; Instruktionshæfte/idéguide; Kniv; Forme; Kagerulle; Modellerværktøj; Formpresseplader/-skiver; Stempler; Opbevaringsbeholder; Andet
it: Accessori per estrusore per impasti inclusi: Formine; Libretto di istruzioni/guida alle idee; Coltello; Stampi; Mattarello; Strumenti per modellare; Trafile/dischi a pressione; Timbri; Contenitore; Altro
zh-CN: 包括面团挤出机配件: 切割器; 使用说明书/创意指南; 刀; 模具; 擀面杖; 雕刻工具; 形状压板/圆盘; 印章; 储物容器; 其他
bg-BG: Включени аксесоари към екструдера за тесто.: Резци; Книжка с инструкции/ръководство с идеи; Нож; Формички; Точилка; Инструменти за скулптуриране; Плочи/дискове за пресоване на форми; Печати; Контейнер за съхранение; Друго
lt-LT: Įtraukti tešlos ekstruderio aksesuarų daiktai: Pjaustikliai; Instrukcijų bukletas / idėjų vadovas; Peilis; Formelės; Kočėlas; Lipdymo įrankiai; Formų presavimo plokštelės / diskai; Antspaudai; Laikymo indas; Kita
ko: 도우 압출기 포함 액세서리: 커터; 사용 설명서/아이디어 가이드; 나이프; 몰드; 밀대; 조각 도구; 모양 프레스 플레이트/디스크; 스탬프; 보관 컨테이너; 기타
hr-HR: Uključeni pribor za ekstruder tijesta: Rezači; Knjižica s uputama / vodič za ideje; Nož; Kalupi; Valjak za tijesto; Alati za oblikovanje; Ploče/diskovi za prešanje oblika; Štambilji; Spremnik za pohranu; Ostalo
hu: Mellékelt tészta extruder tartozékok: Kiszúrók; Használati útmutató/ötletfüzet; Kés; Formák; Sodrófa; Mintázóeszközök; Mintanyomó lapok/tárcsák; Nyomdák; Tárolódoboz; Egyéb
de: Enthaltenes Zubehör für Teigextruder: Ausstecher; Anleitungsheft/Ideenleitfaden; Messer; Formen; Nudelholz; Modellierwerkzeuge; Formscheiben; Stempel; Aufbewahrungsbehälter; Sonstige
ja: 生地押出機用アクセサリー付き: カッター; 取扱説明書/アイデアガイド; ナイフ; 型; 麺棒; 彫刻ツール; 成形プレスプレート/ディスク; スタンプ; 収納コンテナ; その他
fi: Mukana tulevat taikinapuristimen lisäosat: Leikkurit; Ohjekirja/ideamateriaali; Veitsi; Muotit; Kaulin; Muotoilutyökalut; Muotolevyt/-kiekot; Leimasimet; Säilytysrasia; Muu
sv: Tillbehör till degextruder ingår: Stansar; Instruktionshäfte/idéguide; Kniv; Formar; Kavel; Skulpteringsverktyg; Formpressplattor/skivor; Stämplar; Förvaringslåda; Övrigt
en: Dough extruder accessories included: Cutters; Instruction booklet/idea guide; Knife; Molds; Rolling pin; Sculpting tools; Shape press plates/discs; Stamps; Storage container; Other
cs: Příslušenství, které je součástí lisu na těsto: Vykrajovátka; Návod / průvodce s nápady; Nůž; Formičky; Váleček; Modelovací nástroje; Tvarovací destičky/disky; Razítka; Úložná nádoba; Jiné
sk-SK: Príslušenstvo k extrudéru cesta súčasťou balenia: Vykrajovadlá; Brožúra s pokynmi/sprievodca s nápadmi; Nôž; Formičky; Valček; Nástroje na modelovanie; Tvarovacie dosky/kotúče; Pečiatky; Nádoba na skladovanie; Iné
nb: Tilbehør til deigekstruder inkludert: Utstikkere; Instruksjonshefte/idéguide; Kniv; Former; Kjevle; Modelleringsverktøy; Formplater/-skiver; Stempler; Oppbevaringsbeholder; Annet
nl: Deegextruder meegeleverde accessoires: Snijders; Instructieboekje/ideeëngids; Mes; Vormen; Deegroller; Modelleergereedschap; Vormpersplaten/-schijven; Stempels; Opbergcontainer; Overige
ru: Аксессуары в комплекте с экструдером для теста: Формочки/резаки; Буклет с инструкциями/идеями; Нож; Формы; Скалка; Инструменты для лепки; Насадки/диски для пресса; Штампы; Контейнер для хранения; Другое
pl: Akcesoria do wyciskarki do ciasta w zestawie: Wykrojniki; Broszura z instrukcjami/przewodnik po pomysłach; Nóż; Formy; Wałek; Narzędzia do modelowania; Płytki/tarcze do wyciskania kształtów; Stemple; Pojemnik do przechowywania; Inne
zh-TW: 麵團擠出器隨附配件: 切割器; 說明手冊/靈感指南; 刀; 模具; 擀麵棍; 雕刻工具; 造型壓板/圓盤; 印模; 儲存容器; 其他
pt-BR: Acessórios para extrusora de massa incluídos: Cortadores; Livreto de instruções/guia de ideias; Faca; Moldes; Rolo de massa; Ferramentas de escultura; Placas/discos de prensa de formas; Carimbos; Recipiente de armazenamento; Outros
pt-PT: Acessórios para extrusora de massa incluídos: Cortadores; Livrete de instruções/guia de ideias; Faca; Moldes; Rolo da massa; Ferramentas de escultura; Placas/discos de prensar formas; Carimbos; Recipiente de armazenamento; Outro
ro-RO: Accesorii incluse pentru extruderul de aluat: Forme de tăiat; Broșură cu instrucțiuni/ghid de idei; Cuțit; Matrițe; Făcăleț; Unelte de sculptat; Plăci/discuri pentru presarea formelor; Ștampile; Recipient de depozitare; Altele
fr: Accessoires fournis avec l’extrudeuse à pâte: Emporte-pièces; Livret d’instructions/guide d’idées; Couteau; Moules; Rouleau à pâtisserie; Outils de modelage; Plaques/disques de formes; Tampons; Conteneur de rangement; Autre
th: อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับเครื่องอัดแป้งรวมอยู่ด้วย: ที่ตัด; คู่มือการใช้งาน/ไอเดีย; มีด; แม่พิมพ์; ไม้นวดแป้ง; เครื่องมือปั้น; แผ่นพิมพ์ทรง; ตัวปั๊ม; ภาชนะจัดเก็บ; อื่นๆ
es: Accesorios para extrusora de masa incluidos: Cortadores; Folleto de instrucciones/guía de ideas; Cuchillo; Moldes; Rodillo; Herramientas para esculpir; Placas/discos de presión para formas; Sellos; Contenedor de almacenamiento; Otro
vi: Phụ kiện máy ép bột đi kèm: Dao cắt; Sách hướng dẫn/sổ tay ý tưởng; Dao; Khuôn; Cây cán bột; Dụng cụ nặn; Đĩa/khay tạo hình; Con dấu; Hộp đựng; Khác